Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.196

Criminal trespass against children.

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of criminal trespass against children if he or she:

(a) Is a covered offender as defined in RCW 9A.44.190; and

(b)(i) Is personally served with written notice complying with the requirements of RCW 9A.44.193 that excludes the covered offender from the legal premises of the covered entity and remains upon or reenters the legal premises of the covered entity; or

(ii) Is personally served with written notice complying with the requirements of RCW 9A.44.193 that imposes conditions of entry and use on the covered offender and violates the conditions of entry and use.

(2) Criminal trespass against children is a class C felony.

[ 2006 c 126 s 6; 2006 c 125 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 126 ss 1 and 3-7: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2006 c 125: See notes following RCW 9A.44.190.